Nebraska, session 109, LB1098.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1098 LB1098
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 7 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the State Rail Plan Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the State Rail Plan Act:
(1) Department means the Department of Transportation; and
(2) State rail plan means the state rail plan that is prepared and
maintained pursuant to section 5 of this act.
Sec. 3. (1) The department is designated as the rail transportation
authority for preparing, maintaining, coordinating, and administering a
state rail plan.
(2) The Governor, or the Governor's designee, is designated as the
state rail plan approval authority for approving a state rail plan.
Sec. 4. Each year, the department shall:
(1) Conduct a study of passenger rail service provided in this
state. Such study shall be conducted prior to November 1 of each year and
include information relating to the passenger rail service that is
provided in this state and the potential for additional passenger rail
service; and
(2) Produce a report that contains the findings from such study and
electronically deliver such report to the Clerk of the Legislature no
later than December 31 of each year.
Sec. 5. (1) No later than June 30, 2027, the department shall
prepare a state rail plan pursuant to 49 U.S.C. 22702, as such section
existed on January 1, 2026.
(2) The department shall maintain the state rail plan. At least
annually, the department shall review and may revise the state rail plan.
(3) Within ten days after preparing or revising the state rail plan,
the department shall electronically submit the prepared or revised state
rail plan to the Governor for approval or denial. The Governor shall,
within thirty days after receiving such submitted state rail plan,
approve or deny such submitted state rail plan and electronically notify
the department and the Clerk of the Legislature of such approval or
-2-

LB1098 LB1098
2026 2026
denial.
(4) Within ten days after receiving an approval from the Governor
under this section, the department shall submit the prepared or revised
state rail plan to the United States Secretary of Transportation as
specified in 49 U.S.C. 22702, as such section existed on January 1, 2026.
Sec. 6. (1) The state rail plan shall include:
(a) The minimum requirements specified in 49 U.S.C. 22705, as such
section existed on January 1, 2026;
(b) A description of the passenger rail service available in this
state and potential ways to increase the volume or improve the quality of
available passenger rail service;
(c) A list of railroad tracks that require upgrading or improving;
(d) A description of how railroads are intended to correlate with
other transportation infrastructure in this state;
(e) Proposals for increasing freight and passenger rail capacity
traveling within and through this state; and
(f) Available options and current plans for obtaining federal grants
to carry out the state rail plan.
(2) The department shall consider the following when preparing or
revising the state rail plan:
(a) Public feedback;
(b) Feedback from rail transportation advocacy groups;
(c) Feedback from passenger rail advocacy groups;
(d) Studies conducted by the department;
(e) Economic development opportunities;
(f) Intrastate transit available for passengers or freight and areas
in need of or that could benefit from increasing such availability; and
(g) Interstate transit opportunities available for passengers or
freight and areas in need of or that could benefit from increasing such
availability.
Sec. 7. The department may:
-3-

LB1098 LB1098
2026 2026
(a) Conduct studies and collect public feedback relating to the
state rail plan and incorporate the findings from such studies and public
feedback into the state rail plan; and
(b) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the
State Rail Plan Act.
-4-